Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 36

Public Schools Under Modified City Manager-Council Charter

6-36-101. Board of education — Membership — Terms of members.

If a city incorporated under this charter is authorized, pursuant to general law, to establish and operate a school system, the control and management of the schools of the city shall be the responsibility of the board of education, which shall consist of five (5) qualified voters of the city, meeting the requirements of §§ 6-31-105 and 6-31-112.

By ordinance adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire membership of the city council, the board of education may be increased to seven (7) qualified voters of the city, meeting the requirements of §§ 6-31-105 and 6-31-112. The two (2) additional board members authorized by this subdivision (a)(2) shall be elected at-large and shall be voted on by the electors in all voting precincts of the city. This subdivision (a)(2) shall only apply within counties having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand five hundred (31,500) nor more than thirty-one thousand eight hundred (31,800), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Except as provided in § 6-36-103, the board members shall hold office for a term of four (4) years from twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the second Wednesday next following the regular city election at which they are elected, or until their successors are elected and qualified.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.01; T.C.A., § 6-3601; Acts 2000, ch. 959, § 1; 2011, ch. 453, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Removal of member of board of education by recall, § 6-31-301.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-36-102. Nomination, election, and recall of board members.

The members of the board of education shall be nominated by petition and elected at the same time and places as provided in this charter for elections of the members of the city council, except that in the first election the manner of election shall be that provided in § 6-36-103.

The members of the board shall be subject to the provisions of this charter with regard to recall as provided in §§ 6-31-301 — 6-31-304.

Each candidate to the board or any person acting in the candidate's behalf shall be subject to § 6-31-108.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.02; 1959, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3602.

Cross-References. Removal of member of board of education by recall, § 6-31-301.

6-36-103. First election of board — Terms of first members — Subsequent elections.

The first election of board of education members shall be held at the same time and place as the first election of city council members. Eligibility requirements for voters shall be the same as § 6-31-103. At this election, each voter shall be entitled to vote for not more than five (5) candidates for the board of education.

The two (2) candidates for the board of education who receive the two (2) highest number of votes shall be declared elected for a four-year term beginning at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on the second Wednesday next following the election at which they were elected. The three (3) candidates for the board of education who receive the third, fourth and fifth highest number of votes respectively shall be declared elected for a two-year term beginning at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on the second Wednesday next following the election at which they were elected.

For any board of education increased to seven (7) members pursuant to § 6-36-101(a)(2), the initial election of the additional two (2) members shall be held at the first November general election occurring more than forty-five (45) days following adoption of the ordinance required to expand board membership. To ensure staggered terms, the at-large candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected for a four-year term beginning at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on the second Wednesday next following the election; and the at-large candidate receiving the second highest number of votes shall be declared elected for a two-year term beginning at the same date and time.

Subsequent elections shall be held biennially for election of board members to four-year terms.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.03; 1959, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3603; Acts 2000, ch. 959, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257 (1959).

6-36-104. Chair and vice chair.

At the first meeting after each regular biennial election, the board shall elect a chair and vice chair.

The chair shall preside at the meetings of the board and may vote as any other member but shall have no power of veto. The chair shall perform the duties imposed upon the chair by the rules of the board.

The vice chair shall perform the duties of the chair in case of the chair's absence or inability to act.

In the event of a permanent vacancy in the office of chair, a new chair shall be elected.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.04; T.C.A., § 6-3604.

6-36-105. Powers and duties of board.

The board of education has the power and duty to:

Appoint and remove a director of schools as provided in § 6-36-109;

Establish schools, determine the attendance areas of the various schools, and determine the policies and programs of the city school system, subject to the availability of school funds;

Determine the number of teachers and other employees in the city school system subject to availability of school funds, after considering the written recommendations of the director of schools;

Review, revise and approve budget estimates prepared by the director of schools and submit such estimates to the city manager, in accord with budget control procedures described in § 6-35-310;

Initiate, review, revise and approve plans for the erection or improvement of buildings and facilities to be used for educational purposes, and transmit copies of all such plans that bear on the long-range development of the schools to the city planning commission for incorporation as part of the capital improvement program;

Purchase or otherwise acquire land for school buildings, playgrounds and other purposes connected with the city school system; purchase, construct, operate and regulate the use of all buildings, required for purposes of the city school system; and do any and all other acts necessary to establish, maintain, and operate a complete public educational system within the city, including adult education, subject to the availability of school funds;

Review, revise and act upon any recommendation by the director of schools relating to the operation and maintenance of school buildings;

Cooperate with the city council, city manager and other officials of the city government, and with the officials of other governmental jurisdictions, in programs leading to improvements and economies in the public services provided the residents and taxpayers;

Make any investigation that the board may consider desirable concerning administration of the city school system; and

Exercise any and all powers not specifically stated in chapters 30-36 of this title but given to boards of education by general law, except those that are inconsistent with chapters 30-36 of this title.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.05; T.C.A., § 6-3605.

6-36-106. Rules of procedure and meetings.

The board shall adopt rules governing the conduct of its business and meetings; provided, that regular meetings shall be held on the second Wednesday of each month unless another day is set by the board; and provided further, that if a regular meeting date falls on a legal holiday, the meeting shall be held on the following day. The board shall provide by resolution for the time of day and place of all its meetings.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum and the affirmative vote of at least three (3) members shall be required to approve any action; however, if the board consists of seven (7) members, then an affirmative vote of at least four (4) members shall be required to approve any action.

A special meeting shall be called by the chair, by any two (2) members of the board, or by the director of schools, by a written notice delivered at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the meeting, either personally or left at the usual place of residence of the members and director of schools. Such notice shall set forth the character of business to be discussed at the meeting, and no other business shall be considered at such meeting.

All board meetings shall be open to the public, and citizens shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard. The board shall exercise its powers only at public meetings.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.06; T.C.A., § 6-3606; Acts 2000, ch. 959, § 3.

6-36-107. Vacancies.

A vacancy shall exist if a board member:

Resigns;

Dies;

Moves the member's residence from the city;

Has been continuously disabled for a period of six (6) months so as to prevent the member from discharging the duties of office;

Accepts any state, county, or other municipal office or position of employment, except as a notary public or member of the national guard; or

Is convicted of malfeasance or misfeasance in office, a felony, a violation of this charter, or a violation of the election laws of the state.

A vacancy shall be filled within thirty (30) days by an affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining board members, the appointee to serve until the next regular election at which time a successor shall be elected to fill the unexpired term in the manner specified in § 6-31-201, except that the term “chair of the board” shall be read for references to the term “mayor.” If a tie vote by the board to fill a vacancy is unbroken for thirty (30) days, the chair shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. No appointment to fill the vacancy shall be made within sixty (60) days prior to any regular city election. The candidates in such an election to fill the vacancy shall be nominated by petition as provided in § 6-36-102.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.07; T.C.A., § 6-3607.

Cross-References. Removal of member of board of education by recall, § 6-31-301.

6-36-108. Compensation.

The members of the board of education shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of their duties; provided, that such expenses are approved by the board at a regular meeting.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.08; T.C.A., § 6-3608.

6-36-109. Director of schools — Board secretary.

The board of education shall appoint a director of schools who shall be the administrative head of the city school system. The director shall be subject only to the board of education and all orders of the board relating to the management of the schools shall be given through the director. Except for the purpose of inquiry, the board and its members shall deal with administrative officers, principals, teachers and other employees solely through the director. Neither the board nor any member thereof shall give orders to the director's subordinates or otherwise interfere with the director's functions through such means as the making of particular purchases from, or contracts with, any specific individual or organization.

The office of any board member violating any provision of this section shall immediately become vacant upon the member's conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction.

The board of education shall fix the director's salary. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the board as provided by the director's contract of employment. The director has the right to take part in the discussion of all matters coming before the board, but not the right to vote.

The director, or other employee designated by the board on the recommendation of the director, shall serve as secretary to the board.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.09; T.C.A., § 6-3609.

6-36-110. Powers and duties of director of schools.

The director of schools has the power and duty to:

Manage and direct the city school system in accordance with the policies and programs of the board of education;

Appoint, promote, transfer, retire, and remove and take any other established personnel action with regard to all teachers, and other employees in the city school system consistent with this chapter, policies and programs adopted by the board of education and the general laws of the state;

Prescribe, control and correlate the courses of study, textbooks, and educational apparatus and equipment, consistent with the school laws of the state, and the policies and programs adopted by the board of education;

Prepare and issue rules and regulations for the administration and execution of the policies, plans, and programs adopted by the board;

Prepare budgets for the city school system for approval by the board of education and submission to the city manager for final consideration by the city council;

Make periodic allotments of funds appropriated for city school purposes;

Make purchases and contracts subject to the limitations of this charter and such policies as may be prescribed by the board of education;

Prepare for approval by the board of education salary schedules for teachers and other employees of the city school system as provided in § 6-36-111;

Prepare, for approval by the board of education, plans for constructing, enlarging or improving school buildings and other school facilities; and

Exercise such other powers and perform such other duties not inconsistent with this charter or other general laws, as may be prescribed by the board of education.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.10; T.C.A., § 6-3610.

6-36-111. Officers and employees of school system.

All of the officers and employees of the city school system shall be subject to §§ 6-35-407 — 6-35-413 of this charter, with the school system standing in the stead of the city, with the board of education in the stead of the city council, board members in the stead of council members, chair in the stead of the mayor, and the director of schools in the stead of the city manager and the city clerk, and that on actions taken under this chapter, the rules and regulations of the board shall have the same force and effect as an ordinance of the city council.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.11; T.C.A., § 6-3611.

6-36-112. Financial management.

All school moneys appropriated by the city council, all state and county funds received for the city school system, and all other moneys, fees, revenues or income that are received by the city school system or that heretofore or hereafter are granted or permitted to the city school system shall be deposited in a city school fund to be withdrawn only upon the order of the board of education; provided, that a full estimate thereof shall have been summarized in each school budget; and provided further, that those portions of such funds derived from city appropriation ordinances shall be subject to §§ 6-35-308 and 6-35-310.

The board of education shall establish such school funds as are required by general law or as it considers necessary for the operation of the school system.

At the end of each fiscal year an audit shall be made of the accounts and funds of the school system covering the operations of the last fiscal year by certified public accountants selected by the board. The board of education may employ certified accountants to audit all or any of the school funds and accounts at any time it may deem expedient to assure the correctness of the accounts and funds.

Section 6-35-313 shall apply with the board of education standing in the stead of council.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.12; T.C.A., § 6-3612.

6-36-113. School budget.

The city school budget submitted by the board of education through the city manager to the city council shall include estimates of all school revenues, as well as estimates of expenditures necessary for the operation of the school system for the next fiscal period. Neither the city manager nor the city council shall have any authority to modify or delete any item of the school estimates, and the council shall have the power to modify only the total amount of the school budget, except that in no event shall a reduction in the school budget exceed the total sum requested by the board of education from current city tax revenues. Such budget estimates shall not include any requests for the purchase of land, and the purchase, construction, reconstruction, or major alteration of any building for school purposes. Requests for such improvements shall be transmitted to the planning commission for review and incorporation into the capital improvement program.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.13; T.C.A., § 6-3613.

6-36-114. Notice of appropriation.

The adoption by the city council of an appropriation ordinance for the next fiscal year, or the allowance of a continuation of the appropriation for the last fiscal year, shall serve as notice to the board of education of the total amount of the school appropriation for the next fiscal period.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.14; T.C.A., § 6-3614.

6-36-115. Purchases and contracts.

All materials, supplies and equipment shall be purchased by the director of schools in accordance with procedures approved by the board of education, except that centralized purchasing with the city administration may be utilized where it is mutually agreed upon by the council and board or their delegated representatives.

The board of education or director of schools, in making purchases and contracts, shall be subject to the provisions of this charter relating to purchases and contracts by the city council and city manager, with the board of education standing in the stead of the council and the director of schools standing in the stead of the city manager.

No purchase, expenditure or contract shall be made in excess of available school funds.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.15; T.C.A., § 6-3615.

Cross-References. Purchasing, § 6-35-205.

6-36-116. Disbursements.

All disbursements of moneys from the city school funds or other established school funds for the city school system shall be made by checks countersigned by the director of schools or by other school personnel designated by the board of education upon recommendation of the director.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.16; T.C.A., § 6-3616.

6-36-117. Transfer of city schools to county.

The city school system or any part thereof may be transferred to the county upon the adoption of a resolution by the city council after considering the written recommendations of the board of education; provided, that all such transfers must first be approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting in a referendum held for that purpose.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.17; T.C.A., § 6-3617.

6-36-118. Agreement with county to take over county schools.

The city council, after considering the written recommendations of the board of education, may enter into an agreement with the county for the city school system to take over ownership, management and control of that part of the county school system within the city, including land, buildings and all other school property, equipment, and facilities.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 8.18; T.C.A., § 6-3618.

Chapters 37-50

[Reserved]